Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; YOUTH AND AIDS PROJECTS.new text end new text begin $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a grant to the University of Minnesota Foundation for the Youth and AIDS Projects. The grant must be used to develop, implement, and evaluate status-neutral strategies among Black males 15 to 34 years of age at high risk for HIV through nonmedical case management and support services. new text end